Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1913.02
Immunization reports; audit; deficiencies; duties.

(1) The department shall perform annually a random audit of the reports submitted under section 71-1913.01 to check for compliance with such section on an annual basis and such other audits and inspections as are necessary to prevent the introduction or spread of disease. Audit results shall be reported to the department.

(2) If the department discovers noncompliance with section 71-1913.01, the department shall allow a noncomplying program thirty days to correct deficiencies.

(3) The department shall develop and provide educational and other materials to programs and the public as may be necessary to implement section 71-1913.01.

Laws 1987, LB 472, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 36;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 591;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 178;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 104;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 55;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 39;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 501.